Missouri, session 2026, SB1791.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 130, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 130.039, to read as
follows:
130.039. A candidate for a state office shall not make
contributions to his or her own candidate committee in
excess of the contribution limitation applicable to the
elective office sought pursuant to the Missouri Constitution
or statute, whichever is applicable.
✓